Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
CHAPTER 281A Commercial Driver’s Licenses
281A.300.
Criminal history background check for commercial driver’s licenses and permits — Administrative regulations — Fees.

Any person initially applying for, or initially renewing, a Kentucky CDL instruction permit or operator’s license, shall be required to undergo a state and national criminal history background check of state and federal wanted or “hot file” records conducted by the State Police. All initial and renewal application forms for a Kentucky CDL instruction permit or operator’s license shall conspicuously state the following: “STATE LAW REQUIRES A STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AS A CONDITION OF APPLYING FOR A KENTUCKY CDL. ANY PERSON WHO REFUSES TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK SHALL NOT BE ELIGIBLE TO APPLY FOR, OR BE ISSUED, A KENTUCKY CDL.”

The results of the state and national criminal history background checks shall be sent to the cabinet for review within seventy-two (72) hours. An applicant for a CDL instruction permit may enroll in a commercial driver training program under the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or a proprietary school licensed under KRS Chapter 165A, and may be issued a CDL instruction permit upon enrollment, however the status of the applicant retaining the CDL instruction permit shall not be determined until the results of the background checks are made available to the cabinet. The cabinet shall inform an applicant, based upon the criminal history background check, of the applicant’s eligibility to be issued a CDL instruction permit or CDL. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to specify conditions that will cause a person to be denied a CDL instruction permit or CDL based upon the person’s criminal history background check.

Any fee charged by the State Police to conduct a criminal history background check shall be paid by the applicant and shall not be refundable. Any fee charged to conduct a criminal history background check shall be an amount not greater than the actual cost of processing the request and conducting the search.

The criminal history background checks required by this section shall be in addition to any type of background check that may be required by federal statute, rule, regulation, or order.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 204, § 2, effective April 5, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 289, effective June 26, 2007; 2020 ch. 51, § 32, effective March 27, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

281A.310.
Commercial driver’s licenses and permits for nonresidents enrolled in instruction programs.

A person who is not a resident of Kentucky may be issued a commercial driver’s instruction permit and commercial driver’s license if the person is currently enrolled in a program offering commercial truck driving under the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or a proprietary school licensed under KRS Chapter 165A.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 204, § 3, effective April 5, 2002.

281A.320.
Applications for renewal and endorsement of commercial driver’s licenses — Information for criminal background check — Fees.

Any person initially renewing a commercial driver’s license or adding an endorsement after September 30, 2002, shall apply for the renewal at least thirty (30) days prior to the expiration date of the license. The purpose of the early renewal procedures is to ensure the criminal history background check required under KRS

281A.300

may be completed prior to the expiration date on the license. A person may obtain the information necessary to conduct the criminal history background check from the cabinet. If the person has a law enforcement agency other than the State Police conduct the background check, the law enforcement agency may charge the person a nonrefundable fee for the service. Any fee charged by any law enforcement agency to conduct a criminal history background check shall be an amount not greater than the actual cost of processing the request and conducting the search.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 204, § 11, effective September 30, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 290, effective June 26, 2007; 2020 ch. 51, § 33, effective March 27, 2020.